Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1620.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 325E.3892, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Definitions. For purposes of this section, "covered product" means any of the following products or product components: (1) jewelry; (2) toys; (3) cosmetics and personal care products; (4) puzzles, board games, card games, and similar games; (5) play sets and play structures; (6) outdoor games; (7) school supplies; (8) pots and pans; (9) cups, bowls, and other food containers; (10) craft supplies and jewelry-making supplies; (11) chalk, crayons, paints, and other art supplies; (12) fidget spinners; (13) costumes, costume accessories, and children's and seasonal party supplies;new text begin andnew text end deleted text begin (14) keys, key chains, and key rings; and deleted text end deleted text begin (15)deleted text end new text begin (14)new text end clothing, footwear, headwear, and accessories.